North Dakota, session 69, SB2299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 54-10-14 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
1. The state auditor shall audit the following political subdivisions once every two years, except
as provided in this section or otherwise by law:
a. Counties.
b. Cities, and when a city is audited, to include any political subdivision that was created by
the city and has bonding authority.
c. Park districts.
d. School districts.
e. Firefighters relief associations.
f. Airport authorities.
g. Public libraries.
h. Water resource districts , created under chapter 61 - 16 and operating under chapter
61 - 16.1 .
i. Garrison Diversion Conservancy District.
j. Rural fire protection districts.
k. Special education districts.
l. Area career and technology centers.
m. Correction centers.
n. Recreation service districts.
o. Weed boards.
p. Irrigation districts.
q. Rural ambulance service districts.
r. Southwest water authority.
s. Regional planning councils.

S. B. NO. 2299 - PAGE 2
t. Soil conservation districts.
u. Western area water supply authority industrial water sales on an annual basis.
v. Water districts subject to chapter 61 - 35 .
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 54-10-15 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
1. The state auditor, by duly appointed deputy auditors or other authorized agents, shall audit or
review the books, records, and financial accounts of any political subdivision when ordered by
the legislative audit and fiscal review committee. The state auditor, by duly appointed auditors
or other authorized agents, may audit or review the books, records, and financial accounts of
any political subdivisions when requested by the governor, requested by the governing board,
or upon petition of at least thirty-five percent of the qualified electors of any political
subdivision enumerated in section 54-10-14 voting for the office of governor at the preceding
general election or, in the case ofregarding school districts, upon petition of at least thirty-five
percent of the qualified electors voting at the preceding school board election, regarding water
districts subject to chapter 61 - 35, upon a petition of at least ten percent or three hundred
participating members, whichever is fewer, or upon the request of the state court administrator
with respect to clerk of district court services provided by a county in accordance with chapter
27-05.2. Fees for the audits must be paid in accordance with the provisions of section
54-10-14.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 61-35-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
61-35-09. Bylaws submitted at special meeting.
Within thirty days after election of the original board, proposed bylaws must be submitted for
adoption at a special meeting of members of the district, written notice of which must be mailed to each
member. Members present at the special meeting may adopt or amend any of the proposed bylaws,
and may propose and adopt alternative or additional bylaws by a majority vote. The bylaws may
subsequently be amended at any annual or special meeting of the participating members of the district.
However, the bylaws of each district must provide:
1. For an annual meeting of participating members each year after the year of organization of the
district and for mailing of written notice of the time and place of each annual meeting to each
participating member and publication of the notice in the official newspaper of the county or
counties served by the district not less than ten nor more than thirty days before each
meeting.
2. That each participating member of the district is entitled to one vote at all annual and special
meetings of the district for each benefit unit to which the member has subscribed.
3. That each participating member seeking election to the board shall present a petition
containing signatures of ten participating members. All petitions must be submitted to the
secretary of the board or nominating committee at least forty - five days before the election or
by the mail election deadline established under the district's bylaws. Any participating member
who submits a petition must be added to the ballot, provided they reside in the appropriate
district and qualify to serve as a director under the district's bylaws.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 61-35-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:

S. B. NO. 2299 - PAGE 3
61-35-10. Directors divided into classes - Terms - Vacancies.
1. The initial board of each district shall divide its members by lot into three classes of as nearly
equal size as possible. The terms of the directors in the first, second, and third classes expire
on dates of the annual meetings in the first, second, and third years, respectively, following the
year in which the district is organized, or as soon thereafter as their successors are elected
and have qualified.
2. At the annual meeting in each year after the year in which the district is organized, a director
must be elected to succeed each director whose term of office expires on that date, and each
director so elected holds office for a term of three years and until a successor is elected and
has qualified.
3. Vacancies must be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the remaining directors
until the next annual meeting of participating members, at which the participating members
shall elect a director for the unexpired term.
4. All elections held under this chapter must be conducted to allow participating members to
access all stages of the election process, including voting and vote tabulation in a uniform and
nondiscriminatory manner. Each meeting must be arranged in a manner that permits each
participating member to plainly observe the election process.

S. B. NO. 2299 - PAGE 4
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2299.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 1 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State